Utah statutes.
48-2e-1003.   Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership may be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the time the action is commenced and:

(1)  which was a partner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

(2)  whose status as a partner devolved on the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

